hr-HR: Težinska klasa činele: Ekstra teška; Ekstra tanka; Teška; Srednja; Srednje teška; Srednje tanka; Tanka; Ostalo
tr: Zil ağırlık sınıfı: Ekstra ağır; Ekstra ince; Ağır; Orta; Orta ağır; Orta ince; İnce; Diğer
hu: Cintányér súlyosztálya: Extra nehéz; Extra vékony; Nehéz; Közepes; Közepesen nehéz; Közepesen vékony; Vékony; Egyéb
bg-BG: Клас на теглото на чинелите: Много тежък; Много тънък; Тежък; Среден; Средно тежък; Средно тънък; Тънък; Други
ja: シンバル重量クラス: エクストラヘビー; エクストラシン; ヘビー; ミディアム; ミディアムヘビー; ミディアムシン; シン; その他
da: Bækkenets vægtklasse: Ekstra tung; Ekstra tynd; Tung; Medium; Medium tung; Medium tynd; Tynd; Andet
de: Gewichtsklasse des Beckens: Extra schwer; Extra dünn; Schwer; Mittel; Mittelschwer; Mitteldünn; Dünn; Sonstige
it: Classe di peso dei piatti: Extra pesante; Extra sottile; Pesante; Medio; Medio pesante; Medio sottile; Sottile; Altro
ko: 심벌즈 무게 등급: 엑스트라 헤비; 엑스트라 씬; 헤비; 미디엄; 미디엄 헤비; 미디엄 씬; 씬; 기타
ro-RO: Clasa de greutate a cinelelor: Extra-greu; Extra-subțire; Greu; Mediu; Mediu-greu; Mediu-subțire; Subțire; Altele
pl: Klasa wagowa talerza: Bardzo ciężki; Bardzo cienki; Ciężki; Średni; Średnio ciężki; Średnio cienki; Cienki; Inna
fr: Catégorie de poids de la cymbale: Extra lourd; Extra fin; Lourd; Moyen; Moyen lourd; Moyen fin; Fin; Autre
pt-BR: Classe de peso do címbalo: Extra pesado; Extra fino; Pesado; Médio; Médio pesado; Médio fino; Fino; Outros
cs: Váhová kategorie činelu: Extra těžký; Extra tenký; Těžký; Střední; Středně těžký; Středně tenký; Tenký; Jiné
fi: Symbaalien painoluokka: Erittäin raskas; Erittäin ohut; Raskas; Keskipainoinen; Keskiraskas; Keskiohut; Ohut; Muu
ru: Весовой класс тарелки: Очень тяжелая; Очень тонкая; Тяжелая; Средняя; Средне-тяжелая; Средне-тонкая; Тонкая; Другое
sk-SK: Hmotnostná trieda činelov: Extra ťažký; Extra tenký; Ťažký; Stredný; Stredne ťažký; Stredne tenký; Tenký; Iné
es: Clase de peso del platillo: Extra pesado; Extra delgado; Pesado; Medio; Medio pesado; Medio delgado; Delgado; Otro
vi: Phân loại trọng lượng của chũm chọe: Rất nặng; Rất mỏng; Nặng; Trung bình; Trung bình nặng; Trung bình mỏng; Mỏng; Khác
zh-TW: 鈸重量等級: 極重; 極薄; 重; 中; 中偏重; 中偏薄; 薄; 其他
sv: Cymbalviktsklass: Extra tung; Extra tunn; Tung; Medium; Medeltung; Medeltunn; Tunn; Annat
pt-PT: classe de peso do prato: Extra pesado; Extra fino; Pesado; Médio; Médio pesado; Médio fino; Fino; Outra
nb: Cymbal vektklasse: Ekstra tung; Ekstra tynn; Tung; Medium; Medium tung; Medium tynn; Tynn; Annet
nl: Bekken gewichtsklasse: Extra zwaar; Extra dun; Zwaar; Medium; Medium zwaar; Medium dun; Dun; Overig
el: Κατηγορία βάρους κυμβάλου: Πολύ βαρύ; Πολύ λεπτό; Βαρύ; Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο βαρύ; Μεσαίο λεπτό; Λεπτό; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lėkštės svorio klasė: Labai sunki; Labai plona; Sunki; Vidutinė; Vidutiniškai sunki; Vidutiniškai plona; Plona; Kita
sl-SI: Težinski razred činele: Zelo težka; Zelo tanka; Težka; Srednja; Srednje težka; Srednje tanka; Tanka; Drugo
zh-CN: 镲片重量等级: 极重; 极薄; 重; 中; 中重; 中薄; 薄; 其他
en: Cymbal weight class: Extra heavy; Extra thin; Heavy; Medium; Medium heavy; Medium thin; Thin; Other
th: คลาสน้ำหนักฉาบ: หนักพิเศษ; บางพิเศษ; หนัก; ปานกลาง; กึ่งหนัก; กึ่งบาง; บาง; อื่นๆ